Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-5] Determining the amount of the
money of certain contract claims. (a) If an amount contracted to be paid
in a foreign money is measured by a specified amount of a different money, the
amount to be paid is determined on the conversion date.

(b) If an amount contracted to be paid in a
foreign money is to be measured by a different money at the exchange rate
prevailing on a date prior to default, that exchange rate applies only for
payments made a reasonable time after default, not to exceed thirty days.
Thereafter, conversion is made at the bank- offered spot rate on the conversion
date.

(c) A monetary claim is neither usurious nor
unconscionable because the agreement on which it is based provides that the
amount of the debtor's obligation to be paid in the debtor's money must, when
received by the creditor, equal a specified amount of the foreign money of the
country of the creditor. If, because of unexcused delay in payment of a
judgment or award, the amount received by the creditor does not equal the
amount of the foreign money specified in the agreement, the court or
arbitrator, as the case may be, shall have jurisdiction to and shall, amend the
judgment or award accordingly. [L 1990, c 50, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next